Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.345.090

Model school district discipline policies—Adoption and enforcement by school districts.

(1) The Washington state school directors' association shall create model school district discipline policies and procedures and post these models publicly by December 1, 2016. In developing these model policies and procedures, the association shall request technical assistance and guidance from the equity and civil rights office within the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington state human rights commission. The model policies and procedures shall be updated as necessary.

(2) School districts shall adopt and enforce discipline policies and procedures consistent with the model policy by the beginning of the 2017-18 school year.

[ 2016 c 72 s 103.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2016 c 72: See note following RCW 28A.600.015.